Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-935
Retirement; increase in benefits; when applicable.

No provision of section 79-916, 79-934, 79-958, 79-960, or 79-966 which would result in an increase in benefits that would have been payable prior to July 1, 1984, shall apply to any person until that person has acquired the equivalent of one-half year of service or more as a school employee under the retirement system following July 1, 1984.

No provision of section 79-934, 79-957, 79-958, or 79-960 which would result in an increase in benefits that would have been payable prior to July 1, 1986, shall apply to any person until that person has acquired the equivalent of one-half year of service or more as a school employee under the retirement system following July 1, 1986.

No provision of section 79-934, 79-957, 79-958, or 79-960 which would result in an increase in benefits that would have been payable prior to April 1, 1988, shall apply to any person unless he or she is employed on such date and has acquired five hundred sixteen or more hours as a school employee under the retirement system during or after fiscal year 1987-88.

No provision of section 79-916, 79-934, 79-957, 79-958, 79-960, or 79-966 which would result in an increase in benefits that would have been payable prior to July 1, 2016, shall apply to any person until that person has acquired the equivalent of five years of service or more as a school employee under the retirement system following July 1, 2016.

Laws 1984, LB 457, § 7;

Laws 1986, LB 325, § 8;

Laws 1988, LB 160, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1522.02;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 570;

Laws 2016, LB447, § 11.